District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-231

Fixed rate for schoolchildren not over 18 years of age; formula for adjusting and payment of fare subsidy.

Repealed.

Aug. 9, 1955, 69 Stat. 616, ch. 680, § 1
June 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 113, Pub. L. 87-507, § 1(2)
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
Oct. 18, 1968, 82 Stat. 1187, Pub. L. 90-605, § 1
Aug. 11, 1971, 85 Stat. 315, Pub. L. 92-90
Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 446, Pub. L. 93-375, § 1
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-152, § 2, 25 DCR 2534

History

1981 Ed., § 44-215.
1973 Ed., § 44-214a.

Prior Codifications